test/src/morphology/myv-tests_gt-norm.yaml
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосоноктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонокоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонокстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонокошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостоноктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованокоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованокстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованокошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашованоктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонокошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксонококсонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Px1Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашоксоноктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкнконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Comp+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашошканктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкоськак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Def.Sg.Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонконтеньгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкстонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонккантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкошкантькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонкоксонтькак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктненьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнененьгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнедеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнесэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнестэяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнескак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктневаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнекскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктневгак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктневтемеяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктнешкаяк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ine+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: ашосонктненеккак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонктояк
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонкокскак
    ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+NbAmb+Ela+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: ашостонкоськак
